Illinois, session 104th, HB1290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Corporate hiring credit. 8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, each corporation that increases its average employee 10head count in the State by more than 10% over the corporation's 11average employee head count in the State in the immediately 12preceding taxable year is entitled to a credit against the tax 13imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount 14equal to 2% of the corporation's Illinois Income Tax liability 15for the taxable year, calculated without regard to the 16application of this credit.17    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 18the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 19the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 20may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 215 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 22credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 23a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year   HB1290- 2 -LRB104 03196 HLH 13217 b1that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 2shall be applied first. 3    (c) For partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 4corporations, the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with 5respect to the credit under this Section. 6    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 7250.